California, session 20252026, SB865.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12098.9 is added to the Government Code, to read:12098.9. (a) The California Music Festival Preservation Grant Program is hereby established within the office.(b)  For purposes of this section, a “host jurisdiction” means a governmental entity or political subdivision of the state that owns or has an interest in the venue or region where the multiday music festival occurs. Region includes a physical or cultural region.(b)(c) The program California Music Festival Preservation Grant Program shall be under the direct authority of the director, and the office shall administer grants to eligible independent live music events promoters in accordance with this section.(c)(d) The purpose of the program California Music Festival Preservation Grant Program is to provide grants to eligible independent live music events promoters in order to support their continued ability to provide equitable access to the arts for all Californians, and to preserve large-scale music festivals that generate significant cultural, tourism, and economic benefits for the state and its local communities.(d)For purposes of this section:(1)“Eligible independent live music events promoter” means an entity that satisfies all of the following:(e) To be eligible to receive a grant under the California Music Festival Preservation Grant Program, an independent live music festival promoter shall satisfy all of the following requirements:(A)(1) The entity is privately owned.(B)(2) The entity is organized as a sole proprietor, proprietorship, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, or a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. Code.(C)(3) The entity, as a principal business activity, organizes, promotes, produces, manages, or hosts a multiday music at least one festival featuring persons or groups that perform live musical entertainment at a venue in California on publicly owned lands where all of the following take place: are met:(i)A front door cover charge or admission fee through ticketing is applied.(ii)Performers are compensated.(A) Admission to the festival performances requires a paid ticket or cover charge.(B) Performing artists are compensated and do not perform without compensation or solely for tips.(iii)(C) The multiday music festival occurs annually in an eligible jurisdiction and satisfies both of the following: a host jurisdiction.(I)There is a minimum of 100 live music performances.(II)There is a minimum of 100,000 admissions.(D) The festival features a minimum of 40 live music acts.(E) The festival generates a minimum of 60,000 total paid admissions over its duration.(iv)(4) The entity enters has entered into a multiyear agreement for the operation of a multiday music festival with the local tourism authority or the appropriate political subdivision of the eligible jurisdiction for the provision of the multiday music festival. host jurisdiction.(v)(5) The entity demonstrates support for local businesses, performers, and the eligible host jurisdiction as follows: by doing all of the following at the festival:(I)The event shall serve not(A) Serving no fewer than three different beers made produced by a local brewery whose principal place of business is located within the eligible host jurisdiction.(II)The event shall serve not(B) Serving no fewer than two wines produced by a winery whose principal place of business is located within the eligible host jurisdiction.(III)The event shall include not(C) Showcasing no fewer than three performances featuring live musical entertainment by performers who are local to, or based in, the eligible host jurisdiction.(IV)The entity shall provide(D) Providing meaningful promotion of the eligible host jurisdiction in coordination with the local tourism authority or the appropriate political subdivision of the eligible jurisdiction if no tourism authority exists. host jurisdiction.(2)“Eligible jurisdiction” means a governmental entity or political subdivision of the state that owns or has an interest in the venue or physical location where the multiday music festival occurs.(e)(f) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature:(1) The office shall allocate grants to eligible independent live music events promoters that meet the requirements of this section.(2) The amount of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be allocated in one or more rounds to eligible independent live music events promoters.